New Jersey, session 222, S3930.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.   A taxpayer, whose gross income for the taxable year does not exceed $150,000, shall be allowed a credit against the tax due pursuant to the New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act, N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., in an amount equal to the value of qualified homeschool expenses incurred by the taxpayer in the taxable year, up to $1,000 per child or dependent; provided, however, that the credit allowed by this section shall not exceed $3,000 per taxpayer in a taxable year. b.    As used in this section: Qualified homeschool expenses means expenses for educational textbooks, workbooks, and teachers edition books; computer software whose primary purpose is for teaching or self-learning; rental fees for educational curriculum; and membership fees for libraries and academic institutions and organizations.  Qualified homeschool expenses shall not include materials used to set up a home school, including but not limited to computers, desks, boards; consumable school supplies, including but not limited to pencils, pens, paper; and internet provider fees. c.     In the case of married couples who file separately, each person shall be permitted to claim one-half of the credit allowed pursuant to subsection a. of this section for qualified homeschool expenses jointly incurred in a taxable year. d.    The order of priority of the application of the credit allowed pursuant to this section and any other credits allowed against the New Jersey gross income tax due pursuant to N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq. for a taxable year shall be as prescribed by the director. e.     The amount of the credit applied against the New Jersey gross income tax due pursuant to N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq. shall not reduce the liability of a taxpayer under the New Jersey gross income tax to an amount less than zero. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after the January 1 next following the date of enactment.